root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
flag *S:
   [^EíěCňťN]    > E
   [^EíěCňťN]    > I
   [^EíěCňťN]    > EM
   [^EíěCňN]    > ů
   [^EíěCňN]    > ůM
   [^EíěCňťNLSZ]    > íCH
   [SZ]    > ECH
   íL    > ECH
   [^í]L    > íCH
   EC    > -EC,CE
   EC    > -EC,CI
   EC    > -EC,CEM
   EC    > -EC,Ců
   EC    > -EC,CůM
   EC    > -EC,CíCH
   [^E]C    > E
   [^E]C    > I
   [^E]C    > EM
   [^E]C    > ů
   [^E]C    > ůM
   [^E]C    > íCH
   ť    > -ť,Tě
   ť    > -ť,TI
   ť    > -ť,TěM
   ť    > -ť,TíCH
   Eň    > -Eň,Ně
   Eň    > -Eň,NI
   Eň    > -Eň,ňů
   Eň    > -Eň,ňůM
   Eň    > -Eň,NěM
   Eň    > -Eň,NíCH
   [^E]ň    > -ň,Ně
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NI
   [^E]ň    > ů
   [^E]ň    > ůM
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NěM
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NíCH
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NE
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NU
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NI
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NEM
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NY
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,Nů
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NůM
   [^MN]EN    > -EN,NECH
   [MN]EN    > E
   [MN]EN    > U
   [MN]EN    > I
   [MN]EN    > EM
   [MN]EN    > Y
   [MN]EN    > ů
   [MN]EN    > ůM
   [MN]EN    > ECH
   í    > M
   í    > CH
   í    > MI
   E    > -E,I
   E    > -E,í
   ě    > -ě,I
   ě    > -ě,í

flag *Q:
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěR]UM    > -UM,
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RUM    > -RUM,R
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RUM    > -RUM,ER
   IS    > -S,D
   [čDLSTVZž]BA    > -BA,EB
   [čDLSTVZž]BO    > -BO,EB
   [čDLSTVZž]BY    > -BY,EB
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RBA    > -BA,EB
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RBO    > -BO,EB
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RBY    > -BY,EB
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RBA    > -BA,B
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RBO    > -BO,B
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RBY    > -BY,B
   [^čDLRSTVZž]BA    > -BA,B
   [^čDLRSTVZž]BO    > -BO,B
   [^čDLRSTVZž]BY    > -BY,B
   [SRN]CA    > -CA,K
   [SRN]CO    > -CO,K
   [^SRN]CA    > -CA,C
   [^SRN]CO    > -CO,C
   E    > -E,
   [čDďFGHJňPřSšťWXZž]A    > -A,
   [čDďFGHJňPřSšťWXZž]O    > -O,
   [DFHPSZ]Y    > -Y,
   ďKA    > -ďKA,DěK
   ďKO    > -ďKO,DěK
   ďKY    > -ďKY,DěK
   ňKA    > -ňKA,NěK
   ňKO    > -ňKO,NěK
   ňKY    > -ňKY,NěK
   ťKA    > -ťKA,TěK
   ťKO    > -ťKO,TěK
   ťKY    > -ťKY,TěK
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]KA    > -KA,K
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]KO    > -KO,K
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]KY    > -KY,K
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěďťňK]KA    > -KA,EK
   KKA    > -KA,
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěďťň]KO    > -KO,EK
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěďťň]KY    > -KY,EK
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]LA    > -LA,L
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]LO    > -LO,L
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]LY    > -LY,L
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]LA    > -LA,EL
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]LO    > -LO,EL
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]LY    > -LY,EL
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]MA    > -MA,M
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]MO    > -MO,M
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]MY    > -MY,M
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]MA    > -MA,EM
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]MO    > -MO,EM
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]MY    > -MY,EM
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NA    > -NA,EN
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NO    > -NO,EN
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NY    > -NY,EN
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NA    > -NA,N
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NO    > -NO,N
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NY    > -NY,N
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NA    > -NA,N
   Ně    > -Ně,ň
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NO    > -NO,N
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NY    > -NY,N
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěLR]NA    > -NA,EN
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěLR]NO    > -NO,EN
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěLR]NY    > -NY,EN
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RA    > -RA,R
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RO    > -RO,R
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RY    > -RY,R
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěR]RA    > -RA,ER
   RRA    > -RA,
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RO    > -RO,ER
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RY    > -RY,ER
   [^H]TA    > -TA,T
   [^H]TO    > -TO,T
   [^H]TY    > -TY,T
   [^C]HTA    > -TA,T
   [^C]HTO    > -TO,T
   [^C]HTY    > -TY,T
   [^AU]CHTA    > -TA,T
   [^AU]CHTO    > -TO,T
   [^AU]CHTY    > -TY,T
   [AU]CHTA    > -TA,ET
   [AU]CHTO    > -TO,ET
   [AU]CHTY    > -TY,ET
   [HKTZ]VA    > -VA,EV
   [HKTZ]VO    > -VO,EV
   [HKTZ]VY    > -VY,EV
   [^HKTZ]VA    > -VA,V
   [^HKTZ]VO    > -VO,V
   [^HKTZ]VY    > -VY,V
   EK    > -EK,KU
   EK    > -EK,KEM
   EK    > -EK,KY
   EK    > -EK,Ků
   EK    > -EK,KůM
   EK    > -EK,CíCH
   čEK    > -EK,KáCH
   EL    > -EL,LU
   EL    > -EL,LE
   EL    > -EL,LEM
   EL    > -EL,LY
   EL    > -EL,Lů
   EL    > -EL,LůM
   EL    > -EL,LECH
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKU
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKEM
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKY
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKů
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKůM
   NěK    > -NěK,ňCíCH
   EM    > -EM,MU
   EM    > -EM,ME
   EM    > -EM,MEM
   EM    > -EM,MY
   EM    > -EM,Mů
   EM    > -EM,MůM
   EM    > -EM,MECH
   EN    > -EN,NU
   EN    > -EN,NE
   EN    > -EN,NEM
   EN    > -EN,NY
   EN    > -EN,Nů
   EN    > -EN,NůM
   EN    > -EN,NECH
   ET    > -ET,TU
   ET    > -ET,TE
   ET    > -ET,TEM
   ET    > -ET,TY
   ET    > -ET,Tů
   ET    > -ET,TůM
   ET    > -ET,TECH
   EV    > -EV,VU
   EV    > -EV,VE
   EV    > -EV,VEM
   EV    > -EV,VY
   EV    > -EV,Vů
   EV    > -EV,VůM
   EV    > -EV,VECH
   ES    > -ES,U
   [^GHK]ES    > -ES,E
   ES    > -ES,EM
   ES    > -ES,Y
   ES    > -ES,ů
   ES    > -ES,ůM
   [^GHK]ES    > -OS,ECH
   GES    > -GES,ZíCH
   CHES    > -CHES,šíCH
   [^C]HES    > -HES,ZíCH
   KES    > -KES,CíCH
   OS    > -OS,U
   [^GHK]OS    > -OS,E
   OS    > -OS,EM
   OS    > -OS,Y
   OS    > -OS,ů
   OS    > -OS,ůM
   [^GHK]OS    > -OS,ECH
   GOS    > -GOS,ZíCH
   CHOS    > -CHOS,šíCH
   [^C]HOS    > -HOS,ZíCH
   KOS    > -KOS,CíCH
   US    > -US,U
   [^GHK]US    > -US,E
   US    > -US,EM
   US    > -US,Y
   US    > -US,ů
   US    > -US,ůM
   [^GHK]US    > -US,ECH
   GUS    > -GUS,ZíCH
   CHUS    > -CHUS,šíCH
   [^C]HUS    > -HUS,ZíCH
   KUS    > -KUS,CíCH
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMUS
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMU
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZME
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMEM
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMY
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMů
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMůM
   ISMUS    > -SMUS,ZMECH
   NS    > -S,TU
   NS    > -S,TE
   NS    > -S,TEM
   NS    > -S,TY
   NS    > -S,Tů
   NS    > -S,TůM
   NS    > -S,TECH
