root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
aerodynamika/ZQ
akademička/ZQ
Alhambra/ZQ
amerikanistka/ZQ
amortizování/SN
anestesioložka/ZQ
antidiabetikum/MQ
antispasmodikum/MQ
arganoložka/ZQ
asistovávání/SN
astmatička/ZQ
auťáček/Q
auxoložka/ZQ
bahnička/ZQ
baráčnice/ZQ
bavlna/ZQ
bazírování/SN
bělozářka/ZQ
běženka/ZQ
biokosmetika/ZQ
blahoslavenství/S
bleskovice/ZQ
bolerko/MQ
Borovnice/S
bradička/ZQ
brosma/ZQ
bubnování/SN
buditelka/ZQ
bystřina/ZQ
cementování/SN
cenzura/ZQ
citeček/Q
cukrování/SN
cyanóza/ZQ
čekanka/ZQ
čepobití/S
čiperka/ZQ
čtyrstovka/ZQ
čtyřválec/S
Danička/ZQ
deformita/ZQ
dějepisectví/S
deníček/Q
děravění/SN
devadesátiminutovka/ZQ
didaktismus/Q
disipování/SN
diversita/ZQ
doběhávání/SN
docestování/SN
dodlabání/SN
dohasínání/SN
dohlídka/ZQ
dohýkání/SN
doklapání/SN
dokovávání/SN
dolapání/SN
domatlávání/SN
donastavování/SN
dopěstování/SN
doporučenka/ZQ
dopovídání/SN
doroubování/SN
doskákání/SN
dostavování/SN
došití/SN
dotapetovávání/SN
dotříštění/SN
dovkládání/SN
dozdvíhání/SN
draslo/MQ
drbání/SN
družina/ZQ
duodecima/ZQ
důstojenství/S
dvojslovo/MQ
ebonoložka/ZQ
elektroléčba/ZQ
entice/ZQ
eskortování/SN
estakáda/ZQ
Evelína/ZQ
externalita/ZQ
Fatka/ZQ
faxování/SN
filipínština/ZQ
fonotéka/ZQ
fragmentování/SN
frajeřinka/ZQ
furiantka/ZQ
garderobiérka/ZQ
girondistka/ZQ
gravidita/ZQ
grobiánství/S
hahnium/MQ
hebraismus/Q
herbář/S
heterosexualita/ZQ
hlíza/ZQ
hodlání/SN
holismus/Q
houbička/ZQ
hrábnutí/SN
hrdélko/MQ
hučka/ZQ
hulákání/SN
hydroxypropylcelulóza/ZQ
chasidismus/Q
chmuření/SN
Chorvatka/ZQ
chvoj/ZS
chytačka/ZQ
indiferentismus/Q
inklinování/SN
interludium/MQ
italistika/ZQ
jáhenství/S
Janovka/ZQ
jehněčinka/ZQ
Jindřiška/ZQ
Jizbice/S
judo/MQ
kajka/ZQ
Kampala/ZQ
kapalnění/SN
kapslovna/ZQ
kartografka/ZQ
kauzalita/ZQ
kladívko/MQ
klasifikovávání/SN
klihárna/ZQ
klubání/SN
knihovna/ZQ
kolegyně/ZQ
Kolinec/S
kombinatorika/ZQ
kondice/ZQ
konfirmování/SN
kontura/ZQ
korek/Q
kormoucení/SN
kostymérka/ZQ
kožařka/ZQ
krácení/SN
kravina/ZQ
kropička/ZQ
Krušnohoří/S
křída/ZQ
kukla/ZQ
kumštýřství/S
kusadlo/MQ
kvočka/ZQ
kytování/SN
lahvovna/ZQ
lata/ZQ
lehátko/MQ
lékárenství/S
letkyně/ZQ
lidičky/ZQ
lichocení/SN
listonoška/ZQ
lokálpatriotismus/Q
loupávání/SN
lučišnice/ZQ
lžička/ZQ
majorismus/Q
malomocenství/S
maměnka/ZQ
marasmus/Q
máslíčko/MQ
mazačka/ZQ
měchýř/S
melta/ZQ
metařka/ZQ
Michle/S
mikádo/MQ
mimóza/ZQ
Míša/ZQ
mňouknutí/SN
modernistka/ZQ
monstrum/MQ
motorek/Q
mrskání/SN
mulatka/ZQ
myšina/ZQ
nabalování/SN
nacpávání/SN
nadechovávání/SN
nadporučice/ZQ
nadsazování/SN
nahlédnutí/SN
najezdění/SN
nakouření/SN
naléhání/SN
nalezenka/ZQ
námel/HS
napadávání/SN
napohlavkovávání/SN
nároží/S
násadka/ZQ
naskýtání/SN
nastrčení/SN
naškubání/SN
natlučení/SN
navíječ/S
navrtávačka/ZQ
nazouvání/SN
nenávratno/MQ
neřádstvo/MQ
nikláček/Q
nocovávání/SN
nosánek/Q
nulátko/MQ
obejití/SN
obkládačka/ZQ
obkladač/S
obměkčení/SN
obsahování/SN
obtržení/SN
obžaloba/ZQ
očistec/S
odclonění/SN
odehrávání/SN
odhalovávání/SN
odjídání/SN
odkradení/SN
odlezení/SN
odmluva/ZQ
odmontovávání/SN
odpití/SN
odprodávání/SN
odření/S
odstonávání/SN
odšourání/SN
odtušení/SN
odvrácení/SN
oficialita/ZQ
ohlédnutí/SN
ochromení/SN
okraj/S
Okrouhlička/ZQ
ometání/SN
onanistka/ZQ
opatrnictví/S
opomíjení/SN
optimalita/ZQ
orientování/SN
osazenstvo/MQ
oslovování/SN
ostruha/ZQ
osvícenství/SN
otitulovávání/SN
ovládání/SN
ozdoba/ZQ
ožrání/SN
palatála/ZQ
panislámismus/Q
parafrázování/SN
parašutiska/ZQ
paspárek/Q
pauzička/ZQ
pelichání/SN
peluška/ZQ
perníkářka/ZQ
pětkařka/ZQ
pinzeta/ZQ
písemnictví/S
pizza/ZQ
Plavno/MQ
pletení/SN
ploskohřbetka/ZQ
poblívání/SN
podávání/SN
poddůstojnice/ZQ
podhrabání/SN
podloudnictví/S
podrobení/SN
podsada/ZQ
podušení/SN
pohodnutí/SN
pohrudnice/ZQ
pochycení/SN
pokoj/S
polehčování/SN
polévka/ZQ
polovice/ZQ
pomeranč/S
poodskočení/SN
popolezení/SN
poprávka/ZQ
porozbíjení/SN
posilovávání/SN
postava/ZQ
postoupení/SN
poštěkování/SN
potvůrka/ZQ
poučování/SN
povstávání/SN
pozobání/SN
pracna/ZQ
prašivina/ZQ
predikování/SN
prima/ZQ
probroušení/SN
prodlení/SN
prohlížení/SN
projídání/SN
prokopávka/ZQ
prokouření/SN
prolkání/SN
promytí/SN
propletení/SN
prosázení/SN
prostora/ZQ
prostranství/S
prošlehání/SN
protnutí/SN
proužka/ZQ
provlhčování/SN
pružení/SN
prvka/ZQ
přecvičení/SN
předělovávání/SN
předkrajování/SN
předrcení/SN
předrobek/Q
předupravení/SN
přehlcení/SN
překormidlování/SN
přemodulování/SN
přeptání/SN
přesila/ZQ
přestříkávání/SN
přeuspořádání/SN
přičarování/SN
přikročení/SN
přílba/ZQ
připlachtění/SN
přistrčení/SN
přítelka/ZQ
přivlečení/SN
psycholingvistika/ZQ
puncovnice/ZQ
radioamatérismus/Q
rachotění/SN
ramnóza/ZQ
reformička/ZQ
republika/ZQ
respirování/SN
ritualistka/ZQ
rómština/ZQ
rozcupování/SN
rozestrkání/SN
rozjížďka/ZQ
rozkmitání/SN
rozmělňování/SN
rozpolcení/SN
rozsynchronizování/SN
rozveselení/SN
rubanina/ZQ
Růžena/ZQ
rýžování/SN
řada/ZQ
říza/ZQ
samoléčba/ZQ
sazka/ZQ
scvrknutí/SN
sedmdesátina/ZQF
selhávání/SN
senátorka/ZQ
sešrotovávání/SN
Sevilla/ZQ
silonka/ZQ
sjezdění/SN
sketa/ZQ
skrývačka/ZQ
slavení/S
slída/ZQ
slupička/ZQ
smluvení/SN
sňatek/Q
solidarismus/Q
souvěrkyně/ZQ
spalovávání/SN
spodina/ZQ
spolutvoření/SN
sprosťačka/ZQ
starohory/ZQ
stavěč/S
stereokamera/ZQ
stoupenkyně/ZQ
Stružnice/S
střapeček/Q
stupidita/ZQ
sumka/ZQ
Svazijka/ZQ
světoobčanství/S
swahilština/ZQ
šála/ZQ
šesnáctinka/ZQ
škaroupka/ZQ
šklebení/SN
šmudla/PVZQ
šroubek/Q
štrokování/SN
štukatura/ZQ
Tamara/ZQ
technoložka/ZQ
teráska/ZQ
thatcherismus/Q
titulkovávání/SN
tlejivka/ZQ
toskánština/ZQ
travařka/ZQ
trnka/ZQ
trýznění/SN
tržnice/ZQ
tůčka/ZQ
Tyrolsko/MQ
ucucávání/SN
uchození/SN
úchylka/ZQ
ulétávání/SN
undecima/ZQ
upískání/SN
usazenina/ZQ
uskladňování/SN
uštipování/SN
uvozování/SN
uzdečka/ZQ
Vanda/ZQ
vdechnutí/SN
večerka/ZQ
Velšanka/ZQ
vesnička/ZQ
vidlice/ZQ
viklání/SN
vitalismus/Q
vlezprdelka/ZQ
vmontovávání/SN
volička/ZQ
vrbina/ZQ
vředovatění/SN
vybavení/SN
vycpávka/ZQ
vyčistění/SN
vyhazovač/US
vyjídávání/SN
vykrvení/SN
výlevka/ZQ
vyměřování/SN
vypeskování/SN
vyprskávání/SN
výrůstek/Q
vyskočení/SN
vysublimování/SN
vytěsňování/SN
vyvlastnění/SN
vzdorování/SN
waltrovka/ZQ
Záblatí/S
zadání/SN
zahrabování/SN
zakazování/SN
zakulhání/SN
zamíchávání/SN
zapažování/SN
záplata/ZQ
zarachotění/SN
zasoutěžení/SN
zaštěbetání/SN
zauzlování/SN
zažehlení/SN
Zdeňka/ZQ
zdiskreditování/SN
zešednutí/SN
zironizování/SN
zkrvavění/SN
zmodernizování/SN
znevolňování/SN
zoohygiena/ZQ
zpěčování/SN
zracionálnění/SN
ztroskotávání/SN
zvrhávání/SN
žárovčička/ZQ
